Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-2703
Scope and jurisdiction.

(1) The Nebraska Uniform Transfers to Minors Act applies to a transfer that refers to the Nebraska Uniform Transfers to Minors Act in the designation under subsection (1) of section 43-2710 by which the transfer is made if at the time of the transfer the transferor, the minor, or the custodian is a resident of this state or the custodial property is located in this state. The custodianship so created remains subject to the Nebraska Uniform Transfers to Minors Act despite a subsequent change in residence of a transferor, the minor, or the custodian or the removal of custodial property from this state.

(2) A person designated as custodian under the Nebraska Uniform Transfers to Minors Act is subject to personal jurisdiction in this state with respect to any matter relating to the custodianship.

(3) A transfer that purports to be made and which is valid under the Uniform Transfers to Minors Act, the Uniform Gifts to Minors Act, or a substantially similar act of another state is governed by the law of the designated state and may be executed and is enforceable in this state if at the time of the transfer the transferor, the minor, or the custodian is a resident of the designated state or the custodial property is located in the designated state.

Laws 1992, LB 907, § 3.